Vermont, session 2025-2026, S79.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. RECREATIONAL TRAILS COMPENSATION STUDY
COMMITTEE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Recreational Trails Compensation Study
Committee to review whether real property owners who allow use of their
VT LEG #380813 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.79
2025 Page 2 of 5
property for public recreational trails should receive compensation or other
benefit.
(b) Membership.
(1) The Recreational Trails Compensation Study Committee shall be
composed of the following members:
(A) the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation or designee;
(B) the Commissioner of Taxes or designee;
(C) a representative of the Vermont Trails and Greenways Council,
appointed by the Governor;
(D) a representative of the Vermont Outdoor Recreation Economic
Collaborative, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(E) a representative of a land conservation organization, appointed by
the Committee on Committees;
(F) a private landowner who has a conservation easement that
includes recreation, appointed by the Governor;
(G) a private landowner who does not have a conservation easement
on the land and currently provides public access, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(H) a representative who has expertise in trail planning, design,
building, and maintenance, appointed by the Committee on Committees; and
VT LEG #380813 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.79
2025 Page 3 of 5
(I) a representative of the Vermont League of Cities and Towns,
appointed by the Governor.
(2) The Study Committee may invite other entities to participate in the
conduct of the study as nonvoting participants.
(c) Powers and duties. The Recreational Trails Compensation Study
Committee shall:
(1) review how private property currently is made available for use by
public recreational trails;
(2) summarize the costs and liabilities that private property owners incur
when private property is used by public recreational trails;
(3) assess available economic data and other relevant available data or
analysis and conduct further necessary economic analysis to determine the
value that recreational trail access provides to the State and to local economies;
(4) investigate whether and how private property owners in other
jurisdictions are compensated for allowing use of property for public
recreational trails or other public outdoor recreation;
(5) recommend to the General Assembly whether real property owners
who allow use of their property for public recreational trails should receive
compensation or other benefit and, if so, the source of the compensation or
other benefit;
VT LEG #380813 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.79
2025 Page 4 of 5
(6) how to ensure trail siting, design, construction, and management
meet minimum standards; and
(7) how to ensure that new trail development is established based on the
merit of the opportunity being created in comparison to any incentive provided
to a private landowner.
(d) Assistance. The Recreational Trails Compensation Study Committee
shall have the administrative, technical, and legal assistance of the Department
of Forests, Parks and Recreation.
(e) Report. On or before December 15, 2026, the Recreational Trails
Compensation Study Committee shall submit a written report to the General
Assembly with its findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation or designee
shall call the first meeting of the Recreational Trails Compensation Study
Committee to occur on or before September 15, 2025.
(2) The Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation or designee
shall be the chair of the Study Committee.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Committee shall cease to exist on March 1, 2027.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Committee shall be
entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted
VT LEG #380813 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.79
2025 Page 5 of 5
under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than six meetings. These payments shall
be made from monies appropriated to the Agency of Natural Resources.
(h) Appropriation for Committee consulting. In addition to other funds
appropriated to the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation in fiscal year
2026, the sum of $250,000.00 is appropriated to the Department from the
General Fund in fiscal year 2026 to:
(1) contract with one or more consultants to assist with the required
evaluation of the economic impact of the outdoor recreation industry on the
economy of Vermont; and
(2) support the powers and duties of the Study Committee on
development of the report required under this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380813 v.1